sv: Baby och småbarn > Bebisleksaker och aktivitetsutrustning > Lära-gå-stolar: Babygåstol; Baybyhoppställning
nb: Baby og barn > Babyleker og aktivitetsutstyr > Gåstoler og underholdning for baby: Babygåstoler; Jumperoos
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Oyuncakları ve Aktivite Gereçleri > Yürüteçler ve Eğlendiriciler: Bebek Yürüteçleri; Jumperoo'lar
da: Baby og småbørn > Babylegetøj > Gåvogne og aktivitetscentre: Gåvogne; Gåstativer
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Jucării pentru copii și echipamente pentru activități > Antemergătoare și dispozitive pentru distracție: Antemergătoare pentru copii; Joc sărituri
cs: Děti a kojenci > Dětské hračky > Dětská chodítka a chodítka s hračkami: Dětská chodítka; Hopsadla
ru: Товары для детей > Детские игрушки и товары для активного развития > Детские ходунки: Стандартные ходунки; Ходунки с игровой панелью
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー向けおもちゃ > ベビー用歩行器: ベビーウォーカー; ジャンパルー
ko: 영유아 > 아기 장난감/운동용품 > 유아 보행기/오락기: 유아 보행기; 점퍼루
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan lelut ja aktivointi > Vauvan kävely- ja leikkituolit: Vauvan kävelytuolit; Hyppytuolit
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Babajátékok és -tevékenységfelszerelések > Babasétálók és -szórakoztatók: Babasétálók; Ugrálók
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Equipamento de atividade e brinquedos para bebé > Andarilhos e centros de atividades para bebé: Andarilhos para bebé; Jumperoos
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Đồ chơi trẻ em & thiết bị hoạt động > Xe tập đi & Đồ chơi cho bé: Xe tập đi cho bé; Ghế nhún tập đứng cho bé
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Zabawki dla niemowląt > Chodziki i chodziki z zabawkami dla niemowląt: Chodziki dla dzieci; Skoczki dla dzieci
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Jouets pour bébés et équipement d’éveil > Trotteurs et tables d’activités pour bébés: Trotteurs pour bébés; Tables d’activités
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babyspielwaren > Babylauflernhilfen: Lauflernhilfen; Jumperoos
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Juguetes y actividades para bebés > Andadores y centros de entretenimiento para bebés: Andadores para bebés; Saltadores
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴儿玩具/活动设备 > 婴儿学步车与玩具车: 婴儿学步车; 跳跳椅
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Otroške igrače in oprema za razvoj motoričnih sposobnosti > Otroški hojčki in zabavljači: Otroške hojice; Skakači
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Бебешки играчки и игри за активно развитие > Бебешки проходилки и забавни играчки: Бебешки проходилки; Бънджита на стойка
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dječje igračke i oprema > Hodalice i zabavljači za bebe: Hodalice za bebe; Skakalice
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒玩具和嬰兒活動設備 > 嬰兒學步車: 嬰兒學步用車; 嬰兒鞦韆
it: Bebè e bimbi > Attrezzature per attività e giochi per bebè > Girelli e palestrine: Girelli per bambini; Girelli
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Βρεφικά παιχνίδια και εξοπλισμός δραστηριοτήτων > Περπατούρες & συσκευές ψυχαγωγίας για βρέφη: Περπατούρες; Στράτες
sk-SK: Bábätká > Detské hračky a vybavenie na interaktívne hry > Detské chodítka s interaktívnym centrom: Detské chodítka; Skákacie chodítka
pt-BR: Infantil > Brinquedos para bebês > Andadores e animadores para bebês: Andadores para bebês; Jumperoos
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių žaislai ir veiklos įranga > Vaikštynės ir stovynės: Kūdikių vaikštynės; Pakabinami šokliukai
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Toys & Activity Equipment > Baby Walkers & Entertainers: Baby Walkers; Jumperoos
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์ของเล่นและกิจกรรมสำหรับเด็กทารก > รถหัดเดินและเครื่องเล่นเด็กอ่อน: รถหัดเดินเด็ก; เก้าอี้กระโดษ
nl: Baby en peuter > Babyspeelgoed > Looprekken en speelstoelen voor baby's: Looprekken voor baby's; Jumperoo's